New Jersey, session 221, S1854.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 3 of P.L.2015, c.215 (C.24:6L-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in this act: "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Health. "Health care professional" means a licensed physician, physician assistant, advanced practice nurse, pharmacist, or other health care professional whose professional practice is regulated pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes and whose authorized scope of practice includes prescribing, dispensing, or administering medication, whether independently or through a joint protocol or standing order from a physician. "Firefighter" means a firefighter who is employed by or who volunteers for a public fire department. "Police officer" means a State, county, or municipal police officer. (cf: P.L.2015, c.215, s.3) 2.  Section 4 of P.L.2015, c.215 (C.24:6L-4) is amended to read as follows: 4.  a.  Any person, including a county or State corrections officer, firefighter, or police officer, who has successfully completed an educational program approved by the commissioner pursuant to section 5 of this act to administer an epinephrine auto-injector device shall be issued a certificate of completion, which shall authorize the person to administer, maintain, and dispose of an epinephrine auto-injector device. b.    A licensed health care professional may prescribe or dispense an epinephrine auto-injector device, either directly or through a standing order, to a person authorized to administer, maintain, and dispose of the device pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.     An entity employing a person authorized to administer, maintain, and dispose of an epinephrine auto-injector device pursuant to subsection a. of this section may obtain, maintain, and make available to the authorized person epinephrine auto-injector devices consistent with such standards and protocols as the commissioner may establish by regulation. (cf: P.L.2015, c.215, s.4) 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.